District of Columbia statutes.
47-318

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Budget gap” means the difference between estimated expenditures and estimated revenues.

(2)

“Budget modification” means a reexamination of all major elements of the current year budget, and shall contain for the current year budget all elements of the multiyear plan listed in paragraph (4) of this section.

(3)

“Gap-closing action” means any action designed to eliminate the budget gap. Gap-closing actions include increases in current revenue bases and rates; new taxes, fees, charges, fines, and penalties; expenditure reductions associated with lower service levels; and productivity improvements that yield expenditure reductions without a decrease in service levels. Gap-closing actions must be proposed in the fiscal year prior to their implementation.

(4)

“Multiyear plan” means the costs and funding of services in the District over a 4-year period and shall be based on the actual experience of the immediately preceding 3 fiscal years, on the approved current fiscal year budget, and on estimates for at least the 4 succeeding fiscal years. Pursuant to § 1-204.43, the multiyear plan shall include provisions identifying:

(A)

Future cost implications of maintaining programs at currently authorized levels, including anticipated changes in wage, salary, and benefit levels;

(B)

Future cost implications of all capital projects for which funds have already been authorized, including identification of the amount of already appropriated but unexpended capital project funds;

(C)

Future cost implications of new, improved, or expanded programs and capital project commitments proposed for each of the succeeding 4 fiscal years;

(D)

The effects of current and proposed capital projects on future operating budget requirements;

(E)

Revenues and funds likely to be available from existing revenue sources at current rates or levels;

(F)

The specific revenue and tax measures recommended for the forthcoming fiscal year and for the next following fiscal year necessary to balance revenues and expenditures;

(G)

The actuarial status and anticipated costs and revenues of retirement systems covering District employees; and

(H)

Total debt service payments in each fiscal year in which debt service payments must be made for all bonds which have been or will be issued, and all loans from the United States Treasury which have been or will be received, to finance the total cost on a full funding basis of all projects listed in the capital improvements plan prepared under § 1-204.44; and for each such fiscal year, the percentage relationship of the total debt service payments (with payments for issued and proposed bonds and loans from the United States Treasury, received or proposed, separately identified) to the bonding limitation for the current and forthcoming fiscal year as specified in § 1-206.03(b).

(5)

“Multiyear plan modification” means a reexamination of all major elements of the multiyear plan, and shall contain all elements of the multiyear plan listed in paragraph (4) of this section.

(6)

“Tax expenditures” means the revenue losses attributable to provisions of federal law and the laws of the District of Columbia that allow, in whole or in part, a special exclusion, exemption, or deduction from taxes authorized in this title, or which provide a special credit, a preferential rate of tax, or a deferral of tax liability.

History

Nov. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 10-64, § 2, 40 DCR 7347
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
October 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-161, § 2(a), 47 DCR 5805

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-318.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-161 added par. (6).